Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
Vaccination of Emergency Responders

194A.400.
Definitions for KRS 194A.400 and 194A.410.

As used in this section and KRS 194A.410:

“Bioterrorism” means the intentional use, to cause or attempt to cause death, disease, or other biological malfunction in any living organism, of any of the following:

Microorganism;

Virus;

Infectious substance; or

Biological product that may be engineered as a result of biotechnology or any naturally occurring or bioengineered component of any microorganism, virus, infectious substance, or biological product;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of the Department for Public Health within the Cabinet for Health and Family Services;

“Department” means the Department for Public Health within the Cabinet for Health and Family Services;

“Disaster location” means any geographical location where a bioterrorism attack, terrorist attack, catastrophic event, natural disaster, or emergency occurs; and

“Emergency responder” means state or local law enforcement personnel, fire department personnel, corrections officers, and emergency medical personnel who may be deployed to a bioterrorism attack, terrorist attack, catastrophic event, natural disaster, or emergency.

History.
Enact. Acts 2003, ch. 69, § 3, effective March 18, 2003; 2005, ch. 99, § 159, effective June 20, 2005.

194A.410.
Vaccination program for emergency responders.

The department shall offer a vaccination program for emergency responders who may be exposed to infectious diseases when deployed to a disaster location. The program shall include, but not be limited to, vaccinations for hepatitis A, hepatitis B, diphtheria-tetanus, influenza, pneumococcal, and any other diseases for which vaccinations are recommended by the United States Public Health Service and in accordance with Federal Emergency Management Director’s Policy. Immune globulin shall be made available when necessary.

Participation in the vaccination program shall be voluntary by emergency responders.
(2) (a)

Participation in the vaccination program shall be voluntary by emergency responders.

Participation in the vaccination program shall be mandatory for emergency responders who are:

Classified as having “occupational exposure” to bloodborne pathogens as defined by the United States Occupational Safety and Health Administration Standard in 29 C.F.R. sec. 1910.1030, who shall be required to take the designated vaccinations; and

Otherwise required by law to take the designated vaccinations.

An emergency responder shall be exempt from receiving a vaccination when a written statement from a licensed physician is presented to the department indicating that a vaccine is medically contraindicated for that person or the emergency responder signs a written statement that the administration of a vaccination conflicts with his or her religious tenets.

In the event of a vaccine shortage, the commissioner, in consultation with the Governor and the United States Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, shall use federal recommendations to determine the priority for emergency responders.

The department shall notify emergency responders of the availability of the vaccination program and shall provide educational materials to emergency responders on ways to prevent exposure to infectious diseases.

The department may contract with county and local health departments, not-for-profit home health care agencies, hospitals, physicians, or other licensed health care organizations to administer the vaccination program for emergency responders.

This program shall be implemented upon receipt of federal funding or grants for administering an emergency responders vaccination program. Upon receipt of funding, the department shall make vaccines available to emergency responders as provided in this section.

History.
Enact. Acts 2003, ch. 69, § 4, effective March 18, 2003.